South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1-1-697 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 1-1-697. Neither this State nor any political subdivision thereof shall require, by law, ordinance, regulation, order, decree, program, or policy, the use of any language other than English;  provided, however, that provide any forms or services in a language other than English, except in cases of emergency or as otherwise required by federal law. However, nothing in Sections 1-1-696 through 1-1-698 shall prohibit a state agency or a political subdivision of the State from requiring an applicant to have certain degrees of knowledge of a foreign language as a condition of employment where appropriate. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----